Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Public Utility Commis-
sion of Oregon, for the following purposes:
(1) Utility program ......................... $ 40,839,567
(2) Residential Service
Protection Fund ........................ $ 10,589,606
(3) Administration.......................... $ 10,316,913
(4) Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots......................................... $ 1,008,414
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,213,146 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Public  Utility Commis-
sion of Oregon.
SECTION 3. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures  by the Public Utility
Commission of Oregon  from the universal service fund established in ORS 759.425 are not
limited.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 2